Hawaii statutes.
§48E-15 Exemption from taxation by county
property. All revenues derived by the county from any project agreement
shall be exempt from all state and county taxation. Any right, title, and
interest of the county in any pollution control project shall also be exempt
from all state and county taxation. Except as otherwise provided by law, the
interest of the project party or user of such project in a pollution control
project or under the project agreement or related agreement shall not be exempt
from taxation to a greater extent than it would be if the costs of the
pollution control project were directly financed by the project party or other
user. [L 1983, c 237, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next